Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB559.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6102 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 6102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this subchapter which are applicable to specific provisions of this subchapter, the following words and phrases, when used in this subchapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:"Assault weapon." Any of the following:(1) A semiautomatic rifle that has an ability to accept a detachable 44 magazine and has at least one of the following characteristics:12345678910111213141516171819 (i) A part or combination of parts designed and intended to accelerate the rate of fire of the semiautomatic firearm to simulate the rate of fire of a machinegun.(ii) A folding or telescoping stock.(iii) A pistol grip that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of the semiautomatic rifle.(iv) A thumbhole stock, a second handgrip or a protruding grip that can be held by the nontrigger hand.(v) A bayonet mount, a flash suppressor, muzzle break or muzzle compensator.(vi) A threaded barrel designed to accommodate a flash suppressor, muzzle break or muzzle compensator.(vii) A grenade launcher.(2) A semiautomatic shotgun that has at least one of the following characteristics:(i) A folding or telescoping stock.(ii) A thumbhole stock.(iii) A second handgrip or a protruding grip that can be held by the nontrigger hand.(iv) A fixed magazine capacity in excess of seven rounds.(v) An ability to accept a detachable magazine.(vi) A revolving cylinder.* * *"Machinegun." As defined in 26 U.S.C. § 5845 (relating to definitions)."Peace officer." Any of the following:(1) A person who by virtue of the person's office or public employment is vested by law with a duty to maintain 20250SB0559PN0551 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 public order or make arrests for criminal offenses, whether the duty extends to all criminal offenses or is limited to specific criminal offenses.(2) A person on active State duty under 51 Pa.C.S. § 508 (relating to active duty for emergency).(3) A member of a park police department of a county of the third class.* * *"Weapon-carrying officer." A county probation or parole officer who is authorized to carry a weapon in connection with performance of the duties of the officer's employment.Section 2. Sections 6105(b), 6110.1 and 6115(b)(1)(iv)(B) of Title 18 are amended to read:§ 6105. Persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms.* * *(b) Enumerated offenses.--The following offenses shall apply to subsection (a):Section 908 (relating to prohibited offensive weapons).Section 911 (relating to corrupt organizations).Section 912 (relating to possession of weapon on school property).Section 2502 (relating to murder).Section 2503 (relating to voluntary manslaughter).Section 2504 (relating to involuntary manslaughter) if the offense is based on the reckless use of a firearm.Section 2702 (relating to aggravated assault).Section 2703 (relating to assault by prisoner).Section 2704 (relating to assault by life prisoner).Section 2709.1 (relating to stalking).20250SB0559PN0551 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2716 (relating to weapons of mass destruction).Section 2901 (relating to kidnapping).Section 2902 (relating to unlawful restraint).Section 2910 (relating to luring a child into a motor vehicle or structure).Section 3121 (relating to rape).Section 3123 (relating to involuntary deviate sexual intercourse).Section 3125 (relating to aggravated indecent assault).Section 3301 (relating to arson and related offenses).Section 3302 (relating to causing or risking catastrophe).Section 3502 (relating to burglary).Section 3503 (relating to criminal trespass) if the offense is graded a felony of the second degree or higher.Section 3701 (relating to robbery).Section 3702 (relating to robbery of motor vehicle).Section 3921 (relating to theft by unlawful taking or disposition) upon conviction of the second felony offense.Section 3923 (relating to theft by extortion) when the offense is accompanied by threats of violence.Section 3925 (relating to receiving stolen property) upon conviction of the second felony offense.Section 4906 (relating to false reports to law enforcement authorities) if the fictitious report involved the theft of a firearm as provided in section 4906(c)(2).Section 4912 (relating to impersonating a public servant) if the person is impersonating a law enforcement officer.Section 4952 (relating to intimidation of witnesses or victims).20250SB0559PN0551 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4953 (relating to retaliation against witness, victim or party).Section 5121 (relating to escape).Section 5122 (relating to weapons or implements for escape).Section 5501(3) (relating to riot).Section 5515 (relating to prohibiting of paramilitary training).Section 5516 (relating to facsimile weapons of mass destruction).Section 6110.1 (relating to possession of firearm or assault weapon by minor).Section 6301 (relating to corruption of minors).Section 6302 (relating to sale or lease of weapons and explosives).Any offense equivalent to any of the above-enumerated offenses under the prior laws of this Commonwealth or any offense equivalent to any of the above-enumerated offenses under the statutes of any other state or of the United States.* * *§ 6110.1. Possession of firearm or assault weapon by minor.(a) Firearm.--Except as provided in subsection (b), a person under 18 years of age shall not possess or transport a firearm anywhere in this Commonwealth.(a.1) Assault weapon.--Except as provided in subsection (b.1), a person under 21 years of age shall not purchase, possess or transport an assault weapon.(b) [Exception] Firearm exception.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to a person under 18 years of age:20250SB0559PN0551 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) who is under the supervision of a parent, grandparent, legal guardian or an adult acting with the expressed consent of the minor's custodial parent or legal guardian and the minor is engaged in lawful activity, including safety training, lawful target shooting, engaging in an organized competition involving the use of a firearm or the firearm is unloaded and the minor is transporting it for a lawful purpose; or(2) who is lawfully hunting or trapping in accordance with 34 Pa.C.S. (relating to game).(b.1) Assault weapon exception.--Subsection (a.1) shall not apply to a person under 21 years of age who is:(1) a member of the armed services;(2) an authorized weapon-carrying officer; or(3) a vested peace officer.(c) Responsibility of adult.--Any person who knowingly and intentionally delivers or provides to the minor a firearm in violation of subsection (a), or to a person under 21 years of age an assault weapon in violation of subsection (a.1), commits a felony of the third degree.(d) Forfeiture.--Any firearm in the possession of a person under 18 years of age or assault weapon in the possession of a person under 21 years of age in violation of this section shall be promptly seized by the arresting law enforcement officer and upon conviction or adjudication of delinquency shall be forfeited or, if stolen, returned to the lawful owner.§ 6115. Loans on, or lending or giving firearms prohibited.* * *(b) Exception.--(1) Subsection (a) shall not apply if any of the 20250SB0559PN0551 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following apply:* * *(iv) The person who receives the firearm meets all of the following:* * *(B) Pursuant to section 6110.1 (relating to possession of firearm or assault weapon by minor) is under the supervision, guidance and instruction of a responsible individual who:(I) is 21 years of age or older; and(II) is not prohibited from owning or possessing a firearm under section 6105 (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms).* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0559PN0551 - 7 - 12345678910111213141516